Alabama, session 2026rs, HB367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) In Randolph County, the clerk of court
shall assess a booking fee of thirty dollars ($30) against
each defendant incarcerated in or booked in the Randolph
County Jail if the defendant is convicted of or pleads guilty
in cases prosecuted in the circuit or district court in the
county.
(b) The clerk of the court shall enter the booking fee
on the docket sheet and collect the fee in the same manner and
at the same time as other court costs are collected. The
booking fee assessed pursuant to this section shall be in
addition to all other fines, court costs, or other charges
provided by law. The court costs provided by this section
shall not be waived by any court unless all other fees,
assessments, costs, fines, and charges associated with the
case are waived.
(c) The clerk of court shall remit the booking fees
collected pursuant to this section on a monthly basis to the
Sheriff of Randolph County to be deposited in the Law
Enforcement Fund created pursuant to Section 45-56-232.01,
Code of Alabama 1975, and used for law enforcement purposes in
the county.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
HB367 Enrolled
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB367 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 19-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3